dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
    <pardef n="गर/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नेछस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दैनस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूँला</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौंला</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउन</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउनु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ना</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुहोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुहोस</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँदो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुभन्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नपर्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेर</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्थ्यो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्थें</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दथें</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाएँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ियो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुभयो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दैछौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दछौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुपर्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्थिस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िरहिस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दछु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दैछु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दिन</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दछिन्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छेस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छेऊ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>

    <e lm="गर्"><i>गर</i><par n="गर/्__vblex"/></e>
